Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 11. Quasi-Municipal Districts

§ 15-1-1101.
Definition.

As used in this article, “quasi-municipal district” means any sanitary and improvement district organized pursuant to W.S.

35-3-101

through

35-3-107

and

35-3-109

through

35-3-121

or any water district, sewer district or water and sewer district organized pursuant to W.S.

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 167, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-118.1; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-1201; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-1102.
Validation of prior organizations; generally.

The organization or reorganization of any quasi-municipal district by decree, order or amendment thereof entered prior to March 5, 1969, is validated.

All acts and proceedings prior to March 5, 1969, by or on behalf of any quasi-municipal district under law or under color of law, including but not limited to the terms, provisions, conditions and covenants of any resolution or motion appertaining to the authorization or issuance of bonds or coupons, are validated, notwithstanding any lack of power or authority, or any defects and irregularities in the acts and proceedings.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 167, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-118.2, 15.1-118.3; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-1-1202, 15-1-1203; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-1103.
Validation of prior organizations; legislative authority; exceptions.

This article provides necessary legislative authority to validate any organization or reorganization or act or proceeding which the legislature could have authorized in the laws under which the organization or reorganization was accomplished and pursuant to which the acts or proceedings were taken. This article does not validate the organization or reorganization of any quasi-municipal district, or any act, proceeding or other matter the legality of which is being contested or inquired into in any legal proceeding now pending and undetermined and does not validate the organization or reorganization of any quasi-municipal district, or any act, proceeding or other matter which has been determined in any legal proceeding to be illegal, void or ineffective.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 167, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-118.4; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-1204; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.